Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-342
Residence; prima facie evidence.

Proof that a person obtaining a divorce from the bonds of matrimony in another jurisdiction was (1) domiciled in this state within twelve months prior to the commencement of the proceeding therefor, and resumed residence in this state within eighteen months after the date of his departure therefrom, or (2) at all times after his departure from this state, and until his return maintained a place of residence within this state, shall be prima facie evidence that the person was domiciled in this state when the divorce proceeding was commenced.

Laws 1949, c. 124, § 2, p. 331.

Rule as to prima facie evidence applied to Florida decree. Yost v. Yost, 161 Neb. 164, 72 N.W.2d 689 (1955).